Montana, session 2025, SB234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Criminal record background check. (1) Each applicant for licensure as
a massage therapist shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints to the board for the purpose of
obtaining a state and federal criminal history background check.
(2) Each applicant for licensure shall pay all fees charged in relation to obtaining the state and
federal criminal history background check.
(3) The board may require a licensee who is renewing a license to submit a full set of the
licensee's fingerprints with associated fees to the board for the purpose of obtaining a state and federal criminal
history background check.
(4) The Montana department of justice may share the fingerprint data obtained under subsection
(1) or (3) with the federal bureau of investigation.

Section 2. Section 37-33-502, MCA, is amended to read:
"37-33-502. Qualifications for licensure. (1) To be eligible for licensure as a massage therapist as
provided in 37-33-501, an applicant:
(a) shall submit an application on a form provided by the department;
(b) shall include with the application the application fee set by the board;
(c) must possess a high school diploma or its equivalent;
(d) must be at least 18 years of age; and
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 234

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 234.1
(e) must be of good moral character.; and
(f) shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints to the board to facilitate a fingerprint-based
criminal record background check by the state department of justice and the federal bureau of investigation, as
provided in [section 1].
(2) The applicant, in addition to the requirements established in subsection (1), is required to:
(a) successfully complete a massage therapy program of a minimum of 500 hours of study that
meets or exceeds the curriculum guidelines established by any program or organization accredited by the
national commission for certifying agencies or its equivalent or successor and receive a passing score on an
examination prescribed by the board; or
(b) possess an equivalent current license, certification, or registration in good standing from
another state."

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 37, chapter 33, part 5, and the provisions of Title 37, chapter 33, part 5, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Applicability. [This act] applies to an application for licensure as a
massage therapist submitted on or after July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 234